Hawaii, session 2026, GM1337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the Hawaii community
college promise program (Hawaii promise) was created to cover
the unmet direct costs of attendance for eligible students
enrolled at any university of Hawaii community college.
Existing law requires the inclusion of all grants, scholarships,
and other funding sources when calculating Hawaii promise
awards, which can reduce the benefit to students.
The legislature further finds that removing grants,
scholarships, and other funding sources from the Hawaii promise
award calculation will allow students to apply such funds toward
indirect cost needs, including housing, food, and other living
expenses, thereby reducing financial barriers, promoting
equitable access to higher education, and providing better
support for students in completing their academic programs.
The legislature finds that recent changes to the federal
Pell Grant require updates to Hawaii promise to ensure awarding
2026-3433 HB2338 GDI HMSO
niiBiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiH

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
practices continue to prioritize students and maximize the
support they receive.
The legislature also finds that in accordance with article
X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution, this Act
involves a matter of statewide concern.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend:
(1) Hawaii promise to:-
(A) Maximize the financial support for students while
aligning with federal regulations;
(B) Exclude grants, scholarships, and other funding
sources from the calculation of awards; and
(C) Provide scholarships for ninety-five per cent of
a student's unmet direct cost needs; and
(2) The definition of "direct cost" to align more closely
IS with federal financial aid regulations.
SECTION 2. Section 304A-506, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§304A-506 Hawaii community college promise program;
established. (a) Notwithstanding section 304A-501, there is
established the Hawaii community college promise program to be
administered by the board of regents. The program shall provide
2026-3433 HB2338 CDl HMSO
■lilllllllillRillllllll

Page 3 H.B. NO. S?,
C.D. 1
scholarships for ninety-five per cent of the unmet direct cost
needs of qualified students enrolled at any community college
campus of the [University] university of Hawaii.
(b) A student enrolled at a community college campus shall
be eligible for scholarship consideration for a maximum of eight
semesters if the student:
(1) Qualifies for Hawaii resident tuition;
(2) Completes and submits the Free Application for Federal
Student Aid for each academic year and accepts all
federal and state aid[7—grants-?—scholarships,—and
other funding, sources] that do not require repayment;
provided that this paragraph shall not apply to a
student who enrolls in a certificate program;
(3) Is enrolled in a classified degree or certificate
program with six or more credits per semester;
(4) Maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined
by federal requirements established pursuant to title
IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended,
and determined by the campus at which the student is
enrolled; and
2026-3433 HB2338 CDl HMSO 3
iHiHiiiniiiinniiiiii

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(5) Has been determined by the campus to have unmet direct
cost needs.
(c) Scholarships shall be awarded to the extent possible
based on available funds and on a greatest need basis. An award
granted to a student shall be equal to ninety-five per cent of
the student’s unmet direct cost need, based on the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid calculation of need, less
the amounts available to the student from Pell grants and other
scholarships; provided that the unmet direct cost need for a
student who enrolls in a certificate program shall be based on a
suitable instrument, as determined by the university of Hawaii,
less the amounts available to the student from grants and other
scholarships.
(d) To maintain a scholarship under this section, a
student shall meet the requirements of subsection (b)(4).
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
effective July 1, 2026, the Hawaii community college promise
program may coordinate with federal student aid programs to
maximize total financial assistance available to students.
(f) If any provision of this section conflicts with
federal financial aid regulations or federal law, the Hawaii
2026-3433 HB2338 CDl HMSO
iiiniiiHiiiwiiiiiiiini

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
community college promise program shall be administered in a
manner that preserves students' eligibility for federal aid
while providing the maximum permissible state assistance.
[-(e)-] (g) As used in this section, "direct cost" means any
cost directly related to a student's education, including
tuition [-f—educational fees;—and tho costs of books,—s-uppiies-r
and transportation betwccn-thG student's dwelling and the
st-uden-t ’ s campus . ] , fees, books, and supplies."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3433 HB2338 CDl HMSO

lllllillllliillilMlil

H.B. NO. gj
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 13th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2338, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2338, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
106-26